Hawaii, session 2025, GM1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State's food
2 security may be strengthened by growing more food locally and
3 increasing access to local food. This endeavor may be supported
4 by establishing food hubs, which are centrally located
5 facilities that have a business management structure that
6 facilitates the aggregation, storage, processing, distribution,
7 and marketing of locally produced food products. By actively
8 coordinating these activities along the value chain, food hubs
9 may provide wider access to institutional and retail markets for
10 small- to mid-sized producers and increase consumer access to
11 fresh and healthy food, including for those consumers in
12 underserved areas and food deserts.
13 Recognizing that food hubs often encounter financial
14 obstacles when seeking to launch or expand their operations, the
15 legislature passed Act 313, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, which
16 established a five-year food hub pilot program that provides
17 eligible applicants with financial assistance to establish and
2025-2784 SB693 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO. "
i
C.D. 1
1 expand food hub operations on a scale to meet local demand. The
2 legislature finds that additional funds are needed to continue
3 the pilot program to assist food hubs in the State.
4 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate
5 funds for the continued implementation of the food hub pilot
6 program, including the awarding of grant moneys to qualifying
7 food hubs.
8 SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
9 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,500,000 or so much
10 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
11 same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
12 2026-2027 for the continued implementation of the food hub pilot
13 program established pursuant to Act 313, Session Laws of Hawaii
14 2022, including the awarding of grant moneys to qualifying food
15 hubs.
16 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
17 of agriculture for the purposes of this Act.
18 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2784 SB693 CDl SMA-l.docx
niiiiiHiiiiiiiniiiiMHi

693
S.B. NO.
O)
±
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 6th day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 693, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
110

SB No. 693, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives